Illinois, session 104th, HB3817.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5changing Section 2-702 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/2-702)7    Sec. 2-702. Petition for a certificate of innocence that 8the petitioner was innocent of all offenses for which he or she 9was incarcerated.10    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that innocent 11persons who have been wrongly convicted of crimes in Illinois 12and subsequently imprisoned have been frustrated in seeking 13legal redress due to a variety of substantive and technical 14obstacles in the law and that such persons should have an 15available avenue to obtain a finding of innocence so that they 16may obtain relief through a petition in the Court of Claims. 17The General Assembly further finds misleading the current 18legal nomenclature which compels an innocent person to seek a 19pardon for being wrongfully incarcerated. It is the intent of 20the General Assembly that the court, in exercising its 21discretion as permitted by law regarding the weight and 22admissibility of evidence submitted pursuant to this Section, 23shall, in the interest of justice, give due consideration to   HB3817- 2 -LRB104 08745 JRC 18799 b1difficulties of proof caused by the passage of time, the death 2or unavailability of witnesses, the destruction of evidence or 3other factors not caused by such persons or those acting on 4their behalf.5    (b) Any person convicted and subsequently imprisoned for 6one or more felonies by the State of Illinois which he or she 7did not commit may, under the conditions hereinafter provided, 8file a petition for certificate of innocence in the circuit 9court of the county in which the person was convicted. The 10petition shall request a certificate of innocence finding that 11the petitioner was innocent of all offenses for which he or she 12was incarcerated.13    (c) In order to present the claim for certificate of 14innocence of an unjust conviction and imprisonment, the 15petitioner must attach to his or her petition documentation 16demonstrating that:17        (1) he or she has been convicted of one or more 18    felonies by the State of Illinois and subsequently 19    sentenced to a term of imprisonment, and has served all or 20    any part of the sentence; and21        (2) his or her judgment of conviction was reversed or 22    vacated, and the indictment or information dismissed or, 23    if a new trial was ordered, either he or she was found not 24    guilty at the new trial or he or she was not retried and 25    the indictment or information dismissed; or the statute, 26    or application thereof, on which the indictment or   HB3817- 3 -LRB104 08745 JRC 18799 b1    information was based violated the Constitution of the 2    United States or the State of Illinois; and3        (3) his or her claim is not time barred by the 4    provisions of subsection (i) of this Section.5    (d) The petition shall state facts in sufficient detail to 6permit the court to find that the petitioner is likely to 7succeed at trial in proving that the petitioner is innocent of 8the alleged offenses for which the petitioner was convicted 9charged in the indictment or information or the petitioner's 10his or her acts or omissions for which the petitioner was 11convicted charged in the indictment or information did not 12constitute a felony or misdemeanor against the State of 13Illinois, and the petitioner did not by his or her own conduct 14voluntarily cause or bring about his or her conviction. The 15petition shall be verified by the petitioner.16    (e) A copy of the petition shall be served on the Attorney 17General and the State's Attorney of the county where the 18conviction was had. The Attorney General and the State's 19Attorney of the county where the conviction was had shall have 20the right to intervene as parties.21    (f) In any hearing seeking a certificate of innocence, the 22court may take judicial notice of prior sworn testimony or 23evidence admitted in the criminal proceedings related to the 24convictions which resulted in the alleged wrongful 25incarceration, if the petitioner was either represented by 26counsel at such prior proceedings or the right to counsel was   HB3817- 4 -LRB104 08745 JRC 18799 b1knowingly waived.2    (g) In order to obtain a certificate of innocence the 3petitioner must prove by a preponderance of evidence that:4        (1) the petitioner was convicted of one or more 5    felonies by the State of Illinois and subsequently 6    sentenced to a term of imprisonment, and has served all or 7    any part of the sentence;8        (2)(A) the judgment of conviction was reversed or 9    vacated, and the indictment or information dismissed or, 10    if a new trial was ordered, either the petitioner was 11    found not guilty at the new trial or the petitioner was not 12    retried and the indictment or information dismissed; or 13    (B) the statute, or application thereof, on which the 14    indictment or information was based violated the 15    Constitution of the United States or the State of 16    Illinois;17        (3) the petitioner is innocent of the alleged offenses 18    for which the petitioner was convicted charged in the 19    indictment or information or the petitioner's his or her 20    acts or omissions for which the petitioner was convicted 21    charged in the indictment or information did not 22    constitute a felony or misdemeanor against the State; and23        (4) the petitioner did not by his or her own conduct 24    voluntarily cause or bring about his or her conviction.25    (h) If the court finds that the petitioner is entitled to a 26judgment, it shall enter a certificate of innocence finding   HB3817- 5 -LRB104 08745 JRC 18799 b1that the petitioner was innocent of all offenses for which he 2or she was incarcerated. Upon entry of the certificate of 3innocence or pardon from the Governor stating that such pardon 4was issued on the ground of innocence of the crime for which he 5or she was imprisoned, (1) the clerk of the court shall 6transmit a copy of the certificate of innocence to the clerk of 7the Court of Claims, together with the claimant's current 8address; and (2) the court shall enter an order expunging the 9record of arrest from the official records of the arresting 10authority and order that the records of the clerk of the 11circuit court and the Illinois State Police be sealed until 12further order of the court upon good cause shown or as 13otherwise provided herein, and the name of the defendant 14obliterated from the official index requested to be kept by 15the circuit court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of 16Courts Act in connection with the arrest and conviction for 17the offense but the order shall not affect any index issued by 18the circuit court clerk before the entry of the order. The 19court shall enter the expungement order regardless of whether 20the petitioner has prior criminal convictions. 21    All records sealed by the Illinois State Police may be 22disseminated by the Department only as required by law or to 23the arresting authority, the State's Attorney, the court upon 24a later arrest for the same or similar offense, or for the 25purpose of sentencing for any subsequent felony. Upon 26conviction for any subsequent offense, the Department of   HB3817- 6 -LRB104 08745 JRC 18799 b1Corrections shall have access to all sealed records of the 2Department pertaining to that individual. 3    Upon entry of the order of expungement, the clerk of the 4circuit court shall promptly mail a copy of the order to the 5person whose records were expunged and sealed. The clerk shall 6post in the common areas of the courthouse a notice containing 7information about grants for exonerated persons and their 8dependents under Section 62 of the Higher Education Student 9Assistance Act, including the Internet address of the Illinois 10Student Assistance Commission. The Illinois Student Assistance 11Commission shall develop a uniform statewide notice and 12provide the format of the notice to each clerk. 13    (i) Any person seeking a certificate of innocence under 14this Section based on the dismissal of an indictment or 15information or acquittal that occurred before the effective 16date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly shall 17file his or her petition within 2 years after the effective 18date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly. Any 19person seeking a certificate of innocence under this Section 20based on the dismissal of an indictment or information or 21acquittal that occurred on or after the effective date of this 22amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly shall file his or 23her petition within 2 years after the dismissal.24    (j) The decision to grant or deny a certificate of 25innocence shall be binding only with respect to claims filed 26in the Court of Claims and shall not have a res judicata effect   HB3817- 7 -LRB104 08745 JRC 18799 b1on any other proceedings.2    (k) The changes to this Section made by this amendatory 3Act of the 104th General Assembly apply to petitions filed on 4and after September 22, 2008. 5(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-1046, eff. 1-1-25.)